Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.42.045

Palliative care.

RCW 9A.42.020, 9A.42.030, 9A.42.035, and 9A.42.037 do not apply when a terminally ill or permanently unconscious person or his or her legal surrogate, as set forth in chapter 7.70 RCW, requests, and the person receives, palliative care from a licensed home health agency, hospice agency, nursing home, or hospital providing care under the medical direction of a physician. As used in this section, the terms "terminally ill" and "permanently unconscious" have the same meaning as "terminal condition" and "permanent unconscious condition" in chapter 70.122 RCW.

[ 2002 c 219 s 4; 2000 c 76 s 3; 1997 c 392 s 512.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.

Short title—Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Part headings and captions not law—1997 c 392: See notes following RCW 74.39A.009.